test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-piess_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pieʹss e-stem: # Noun 'nest' - full paradigm
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: pieʹss
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: pieʹzz
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: pieʹzz
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: peässa
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: pieʹzzest
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Com+Indef: pieʹzzin
     pieʹss+N+Ess+Indef: pieʹssen
     pieʹss+N+Par+Indef: pieʹssed
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [pieʹzztaa, pieʹzztää]
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: pieʹzz
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: pieʹzzi
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: pieʹzzid
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: pieʹzzid
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: pieʹzzin
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Com+Indef: pieʹzzivuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [pieʹzzitaa, pieʹzzitää]
     pieʹss+N+Der/teʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: pieʹzzteʹm
     pieʹss+N+Der/teʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: pieʹzzteeʹm
     pieʹss+N+Der/teʹm+A+Attr: pieʹzzteʹmes
     pieʹss+N+Der/t+A+Comp: pieʹzztab
     pieʹss+N+Der/t+A+Der/umus+Superl: pieʹzztumus
